Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 17.
MOTOR AND OTHER

VEHICLES

Chapter

286 Highway Safety

286A Vehicle Equipment Safety Compact--Repealed

286C Driver License Compact

286G Driver Education and Training Fund

287 Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act

288 Common Carriers, Compulsory Insurance

289 Used Motor Vehicle Parts and Accessories

290 Abandoned Vehicles

291 Traffic Violations

291A Nonresident Violator Compact

291C Statewide Traffic Code

291D Adjudication of Traffic Infractions

291E Use of Intoxicants While Operating a Vehicle

292 Odometer Accuracy and Record
Maintenance--Repealed

293 Bicycles

294 Motor Vehicle Accident Reparations--Repealed

CHAPTER
286

HIGHWAY
SAFETY

Part I. General Provisions

Section

286-1 Short title

286-2 Definitions

286-3 Powers and duties of the governor

286-4 Repealed

286-4.1 Medical advisory board

286-5 State highway safety council

286-6 County traffic or highway safety councils

286-7 County highway safety programs

286-8 Rules and regulations

286-9 Facilities for physically handicapped
persons

286-10 Arrest or citation

286-11 Repealed

286-12 All-terrain vehicle; utility-terrain
vehicle;

permitted use

Part IA. Motor Vehicle Regulation

286-16 Powers and duties

286-17 Enforcement

286-18 Rules

Part II. Inspection of Vehicles and Mopeds

286-21 Vehicles and mopeds without required equipment or in

unsafe condition

286-22 Inspection by officers of the police department

286-23 Responsibility for compliance

286-24 Registered owner's responsibility;
registration

plates as prima facie evidence as to the
fault of

the registered owner

286-25 Operation of a vehicle or moped without a certificate

of inspection

286-26 Certificates of inspection

286-26.5 Special interest vehicles

286-27 Permits to operate official inspection
stations

286-28 Suspension or revocation of permits

286-29 Improper representation as official

inspection station

286-30 False certificates

Part III. Registration of Vehicles

286-41 Application for registration; full faith
and

credit to current certificates; this part
not

applicable to certain equipment

286-42 County finance director's duties

286-43 Defacing serial numbers, etc., of motor
vehicles

286-44 Unlawful to possess certain motor
vehicles,

parts, etc.; forfeiture

286-44.5 Salvage certificate

286-45 Records of county finance director

286-46 Tax lien and encumbrance record

286-47 Certificate of registration; certificate
of

ownership; containers

286-47.2 Certificate of trailer registration

286-47.5 Notice of change of address or name;
penalty

286-48 Certificates of ownership of salvaged
motor vehicles

286-49 Registration of vehicles under two or more
names

286-50 Registration of vehicle located outside
State;

correction of errors; fee for correcting
errors

286-51 Registration, expense

286-51.5 Junking of nonrepairable vehicle

286-52 Procedure when title of vehicle
transferred;

delivery of certificate mandatory

286-52.4 Terminal rental adjustment clause; vehicle
leases

286-52.5 Procedure when registration of a trailer
transferred

286-53 Dealers in new motor vehicles

286-53.1 Boat dealers; trailers without plates

286-53.5 Permanent registration of fleet vehicles

286-53.6 Fleet vehicles, fees

286-54 Out-of-state vehicle permit

286-55 Certificates lost or mutilated

286-56 Official cars

286-56.5 Special license plates for consul or
official

representative of foreign or territorial
government

286-57 Unlawful removal of motor vehicles from
State

286-58 Appeal from finance director's decision

286-59 Appeal; procedure

286-60 Rules of procedure; costs; appeal

286-61 Penalty

286-62 Special license plates authorized

286-63 Shape, size and color of plates; how
affixed

286-64 Regulation plates to be surrendered

286-65 Surrender, transfer, and disposal of
special plates

286-66 Director in charge

286-67 Fees

286-68 Interpretation of part

286-69 Penalty

Part IV. Safety Equipment

286-81 Motorcycle, motor scooter, etc.;
protective devices

286-82 Penalty

286-83 Sales of motor vehicle equipment; approval

and identification required; prohibitions
on use

286-84 Revocation of approval

286-85 Reconstructed vehicles, approval required

Part V. Driver Training School and Driving

Instructors--Repealed

286-91 to 97 Repealed

Part VI. Motor Vehicle Driver Licensing

286-101 Designation of examiner of drivers

286-101.5 Reciprocal licensing privileges

286-102 Licensing

286-102.3 Commercial drivers under the age of
twenty-one

286-102.5 Military Selective Service Act; Selective
Service

System registration

286-102.6 Provisional license for persons under the
age

of eighteen

286-103 Restrictions on driver's license; rules
and

regulations

286-104 Which persons shall not be licensed

286-104.5 Limited purpose driver's license, limited
purpose

provisional driver's license, and limited
purpose

instruction permits

286-105 What persons are exempt from license

286-106 Expiration of licenses

286-106.5 Expiration of licenses; out-of-country
active

duty military personnel and dependents

286-107 License renewals; procedures and
requirements

286-107.5 Reactivation of expired license; fees;
road test

waived

286-108 Examination of applicants

286-108.4 Driver education and behind-the-wheel
driver

training program

286-108.5 Repealed

286-109 General provision governing the issuance
of licenses

286-109.4 Designation of advance health-care
directive

286-109.5 Designation of anatomical gift

286-109.6 Limited access to driver's license
anatomical gift

data

286-109.7 Organ and tissue education fee

286-110 Instruction permits

286-111 Application for license, provisional
license,

instruction permit, limited purpose
driver's license,

limited purpose provisional driver's
license, or

limited purpose instruction permit; fees

286-112 Application of minors; liability of
parents or

guardian

286-113 Release from liability

286-114 Revocation of license, provisional
license, or

instruction permit upon death of person

signing minor's application

286-115 Repealed

286-116 License, insurance identification card,
possession,

exhibition

286-116.5 Notice of change of address or name;
penalty

286-117 Duplicate permits, provisional licenses,
and

licenses

286-118 Records to be kept by the examiner of
drivers

286-118.5 License revoked for operating a vehicle
under the

influence of an intoxicant; eligibility
for license

renewal

286-119 Authority of examiner of drivers to
suspend

or revoke licenses

286-120 Authority of examiner of drivers to cancel
licenses

286-121 Suspending or revoking privileges of nonresident
and

reporting convictions, suspensions, and
revocations

286-122 Suspension of a license; surrender

286-123 Record of conviction forwarded to examiner
of

drivers

286-124 Mandatory revocation of license by a court

286-125 Discretionary revocation or suspension of
license by

a court

286-126 Period of suspension or revocation

286-127 Repealed

286-128 Evaluation of nonresident driving
privileges;

reports of outside convictions; reports of

convictions by courts-martial or United
States

commissioners

286-129 Appeal to circuit court

286-130 No operation under foreign license during
revocation

or suspension in this State

286-131 Unlawful use of license

286-132 Driving while license suspended or revoked

286-133 Unlawful to permit unauthorized person to
drive

286-134 Employing unlicensed driver

286-135 Renting motor vehicle to another

286-136 Penalty

286-137 District courts to keep records

286-138 Prohibiting "fixing" of tickets
and providing

penalties therefor; nolle prosequi by
prosecuting

attorney only by motion and approval of
court

286-139 Preferred insurance rate

286-140 Repealed

Part VII. Alcohol, Drugs, and Highway

Safety--Repealed

286-151 to 163 Repealed

Part VIII. Traffic Records

286-171 Statewide traffic records system

286-172 Furnishing of information

Part IX. Pupil Transportation

286-181 Pupil transportation safety

Part X. Miscellaneous Provisions

286-191 Repealed

Part XI. Motor Carrier Safety Law

286-201 Definitions

286-202 General duties and powers of the director

286-202.5 Driver improvement program

286-202.6 Marking of motor carrier vehicles

286-202.8 Mudguards; protective devices

286-203 Enforcement

286-204 Accounts, records, and reports

286-204.5 Vehicle identification card

286-205 Reports as evidence

286-206 Penalty

286-207 Exemptions, certain vehicles

286-208 Exemptions, vehicles used by farmers

286-209 Safety inspection of motor carrier
vehicles

286-210 Operation of a motor carrier vehicle

without a safety inspection decal

286-211 Permits to operate official inspection
stations

286-212 Suspension or revocation of permits

286-213 Improper representation as official
inspection

station

286-214 False certificates

286-215 Fees and charges

286-216 Fines, fees and charges

Part XII. Transportation of Hazardous
Materials

286-221 Definitions

286-222 General powers

286-223 Scope

286-224 Inspections

286-225 Hazardous materials incident reporting

286-226 Routes

286-227 Penalty

Part XIII. Commercial Driver Licensing

286-231 Definitions

286-232 Limitation on number of driver's licenses

286-233 Notification requirements

286-234 Employer responsibilities

286-235 Commercial driver's license required

286-235.5 Persons exempt from licensure

286-236 Commercial driver's license qualification
standards

286-236.5 Renumbered

286-237 Repealed

286-238 Application for commercial driver's
license or

commercial learner's permit

286-238.2 Commercial learner's permit

286-238.5 Repealed

286-239 Commercial driver's license

286-239.5 Reactivation of expired commercial driver's
license;

fees; road test waived

286-240 Disqualification, cancellation, and
downgrade

286-241 Notification of disqualification,
suspension,

revocation, cancellation, marking medical

certification status as not-certified, or

downgrading of commercial driver's
licenses or permits

286-241.4 Authority of examiner of drivers to
suspend, revoke,

cancel, mark the medical certification
status as

not-certified, or downgrade commercial
driver's

license or permit

286-241.5 Notification and hearing

286-241.6 Appeal to circuit court

286-242 Commercial drivers prohibited from
operating with

any alcohol in their body

286-243 Implied consent requirements for
commercial motor

vehicle drivers

286-244 Notification of traffic convictions

286-245 Driving record information to be recorded
and

furnished

286-246 Authority to make rules

286-247 Authority to enter agreements

286-248 Reciprocity

286-249 Penalty

Part XIV. Administrative Revocation of
Driver's

License and Motor Vehicle

Registration--Repealed

286-251 to 266 Repealed

Part XV. Interisland Shipping of Vehicles

286-271 Interisland shipping of vehicles; proof
required

Part XVI. Civil Identification Cards

286-301 Issuance of identification card or
temporary card

286-302 Oaths and investigations

286-303 Application for identification card

286-304 Procedure

286-305 Contents and characteristics; form

286-306 Expiration; renewal; replacement

286-307 Identification cards not to be altered;
duties

of holder; lost certificates

286-308 Correction or alteration of records and

identification cards in cases of error or

subsequent changes concerning names,
citizenship,

description, etc.

286-309 Rules

286-310 Forms

286-311 Custody and use of records; confidential

information

286-312 Civil identification card fee special fund

286-313 Reimbursement to counties

Note

For electric vehicle registration, parking, HOV lane use, and
rules (repealed June 30, 2020) as provided by L 2012, c 168, §2, see note
following §291-71.

Traffic safety and major accident reporting protocols by each
county police department. L 2010, c 104.

Working group on documentation for state civil identification
card; reports to 2016-2017 legislature (dissolved June 30, 2017). L 2015, c
243.

Revision Note

The amendments made to part VI by L 2012, c 310, §§2
(enacting subpart B to part VI), 5 (amending the part VI title), 6 (adding a
subpart A title to part VI), and 8 (amending §§286-101, 286-102(e), 286-104,
286-106, 286-107(c), 286-108(a), 286-110(a), 286-112(a) and (c), 286-113,
286-114, and 286-122(a) to change "part" to "subpart") are
omitted as the new subpart B added to part VI was renumbered as part XVI
pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Complete streets, see §264-20.5.

Nonresident violator compact, see chapter 291A.

Law Journals and Reviews

Intextication: Txting Whl Drvng. Does the Punishment Fit
the Crime? 32 UH L. Rev. 359 (2010).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next